Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-230
Public libraries; establishment.

A city of the primary class may establish, maintain, and operate public library facilities, purchase books, papers, maps, and manuscripts therefor, receive donations and bequests of money or property for such facilities, books, papers, maps, and manuscripts in trust or otherwise, and pass necessary bylaws and regulations for the protection and government of such facilities, books, papers, maps, and manuscripts.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXI, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 4441;

C.S.1922, § 3825;

C.S.1929, § 15-228;

R.S.1943, § 15-230;

Laws 1961, c. 36, § 2, p. 161;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 47.